Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28A.155.090 and 2023 c 436 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The superintendent of public instruction shall have the duty and authority, through the administrative section or unit for the education of children with disabilities, to:(1) Assist school districts in the formation of programs to meet the needs of children with disabilities;(2) Develop interdistrict cooperation programs for children with disabilities as authorized in RCW 28A.225.250;(3) Provide, upon request, to parents or guardians of children with disabilities, information as to the special education programs for students with disabilities offered within the state;(4) Assist, upon request, the parent or guardian of any child with disabilities in the placement of any child with disabilities who is eligible for but not receiving special educational services for children with disabilities;(5) Approve school district and agency programs as being eligible for special excess cost financial aid to students with disabilities;(6) Establish standards for authorizing, monitoring, and investigating private schools approved by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.130, other private in-state entities, and any out-of-state entities, that contract with school districts under RCW 28A.155.060 to provide special education and related services to children with disabilities. The standards must ensure that any children with disabilities placed in authorized entities by school districts have the same rights, protections, and access to special education and related services that they would have if served by a school district;(7) Consistent with the provisions of RCW 28A.150.390, 28A.160.030, and 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.160, and part B of the federal individuals with disabilities education improvement act, administer administrative hearings and other procedures to ensure procedural safeguards of children with disabilities;(8) Maintain an online record of all final decisions issued in response to special education community complaints. Each final decision must be available in an online format and accessible to the public at no charge for 20 years after the complaint is finalized. If, at the effective date of this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction does not have a historical record of community complaint decisions from the prior 20 years, it must provide an online record of all final decisions for the longest period of time available; and(((8)))(9) Promulgate such rules as are necessary to implement part B of the federal individuals with disabilities education improvement act or other federal law providing for special education services for children with disabilities and the several provisions of RCW 28A.150.390, 28A.160.030, and 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.160 and to ensure appropriate access to and participation in the general education curriculum and participation in statewide assessments for all students with disabilities.--- END ---